South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3238.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 31 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 31-3-60. A public housing authority or agency that is engaging in a project that displaces residents pursuant to Rental Assistance Demonstration (RAD) under the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development shall ensure that sufficient funds are available to relocate all displaced residents into housing that is equivalent to the housing in which they are forced to leave. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----